North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-310.54.
(Repealed effective June 30, 2031) Mercury Pollution Prevention Fund.

The Mercury Pollution Prevention Fund is established in the Department. Revenue is credited to the Fund from the certificate of title fee under

G.S. 20-85

.

Revenue in the Mercury Pollution Prevention Fund shall be used for the following purposes:

To reimburse the Department and others for costs incurred in implementing the mercury switch removal program.

To establish and implement recycling programs for products containing mercury, including at least recycling programs for light bulbs and thermostats.

(b1)
The reimbursable costs under subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section are:

(1)
Five dollars ($5.00) for each mercury switch removed by a vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility pursuant to this Article and sent to destination facilities
in accordance with the NVMSRP for recycling or disposal.

(2)
Costs incurred by the Department in administering the program.

The Department shall reimburse vehicle crushers, vehicle dismantlers, vehicle recyclers, and scrap vehicle processing facilities based on a reimbursement request that attests to the number of switches sent to destination facilities for recycling or disposal
in accordance with the NVMSRP. Each reimbursement request shall be verified against information posted on the Internet site provided by the vehicle manufacturers in accordance with the NVMSRP, or against other information that
verifies the reimbursement requested to the satisfaction of the Department. The vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility shall provide the Department with any information requested
by the Department to verify the accuracy of a reimbursement request. Each vehicle crusher, vehicle dismantler, vehicle recycler, or scrap vehicle processing facility shall maintain accurate records that support each reimbursement
request for a minimum of three years from the date the reimbursement request is approved.

History.
2005-384, s. 1; 2006-255, s. 5; 2007-142, ss. 4, 9; 2011-145, s. 13.10B(a); 2016-94, s. 14.1(a); 2017-57, s. 13.21(a), (b); 2020-74, s. 7(a), (b).

Part 6 Has a Delayed Repeal Date.

Session Laws 2007-142, s. 9, as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.1(a), as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 13.21(a), and as amended by Session Laws 2020-74, s. 7(a), provides, in part: “Effective June 30, 2031, Part 6 of Article 9 of Chapter
130A of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, is repealed.”

§ 130A-310.55.
(Repealed effective June 30, 2031) Violations of Article; enforcement.

It is unlawful for a person to do any of the following:

Knowingly flatten, crush, bale, shred, or otherwise alter the condition of a vehicle from which accessible mercury switches have not been removed, in any manner that would prevent or significantly hinder the removal of a mercury switch.

Willfully fail to remove a mercury switch when the person is required to do so.

Knowingly make a false report that a mercury switch has been removed from an end-of-life vehicle.

Obtain a mercury switch from another source and falsely report that it was removed from a vehicle processed for recycling.

Any person who violates subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of this section shall be punished as provided in

G.S. 14-3

.

Any person who violates subdivision (3) or (4) of subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided in

G.S. 130A-26.2

.

A violation of any provision of this Part, any rule adopted pursuant to this Part, or any rule governing universal waste may be enforced by an administrative or civil action as provided in Part 2 of Article 1 of this Chapter.

History.
2005-384, s. 1; 2006-255, s. 5; 2007-142, ss. 5, 9; 2016-94, s. 14.1(a); 2017-57, s. 13.21(a); 2020-74, s. 7(a).

Part 6 Has a Delayed Repeal Date.

Session Laws 2007-142, s. 9, as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.1(a), as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 13.21(a), and as amended by Session Laws 2020-74, s. 7(a), provides, in part: “Effective June 30, 2031, Part 6 of Article 9 of Chapter
130A of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, is repealed.”

§ 130A-310.56.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-142, s. 6, as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.1(a), effective June 29, 2007.

§ 130A-310.57.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-200, s. 21(f), effective August 1, 2012.

History.
2005-384, s. 1; 2006-255, s. 5; 2007-142, s. 7; 2010-142, s. 2; repealed by 2012-200, s. 21(f), effective August 1, 2012.

§ 130A-310.58.
(Repealed effective June 30, 2031) Adoption of rules; administrative procedure.

The Department may adopt rules to implement this Part.

Chapter 150B of the General Statutes governs implementation of this Part.

History.
2005-384, s. 1; 2006-255, s. 5; 2016-94, s. 14.1(a); 2017-57, s. 13.21(a); 2020-74, s. 7(a).

Part 6 Has a Delayed Repeal Date.

Session Laws 2007-142, s. 9, as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.1(a), as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 13.21(a), and as amended by Session Laws 2020-74, s. 7(a), provides, in part: “Effective June 30, 2031, Part 6 of Article 9 of Chapter
130A of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, is repealed.”

§ 130A-310.59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 7. Management of Certain Products That Contain Mercury.

§ 130A-310.60.
Recycling required by public agencies.

Each State agency, including the General Assembly, the General Court of Justice, universities, community colleges, public schools, and political subdivisions using State funds for the construction or operation of public buildings shall establish a program
in cooperation with the Department of Environmental Quality and the Department of Administration for the collection and recycling of all spent fluorescent lights and thermostats that contain mercury generated in public buildings
owned by each respective entity. The program shall include procedures for convenient collection, safe storage, and proper recycling of spent fluorescent lights and thermostats that contain mercury and contractual or other arrangements
with buyers of the recyclable materials.

Each State agency, including the General Assembly, the General Court of Justice, universities, community colleges, the Department of Public Instruction on behalf of the public schools, and political subdivisions shall submit a report on or before December
1, 2011, that documents the entity’s compliance with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section to the Department of Environmental Quality and the Department of Administration. The Departments shall compile the information
submitted and jointly shall submit a report to the Environmental Review Commission on or before January 15, 2012, concerning the activities required by subsection (a) of this section. The information provided shall also be included
in the report required by G.S. 130A-309.06(c).

For purposes of this section, a political subdivision is using State funds when it receives grant funding from the State for the construction or operation of a public building.

History.
2010-180, s. 14(a); 2011-394, s. 5; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-394, s. 5, effective July 1, 2011, added subsection (c).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsections (a) and (b).

§ 130A-310.61.
Removal and recycling of mercury-containing products from structures to be demolished.

Prior to demolition of any building or structure in the State, the contractor responsible for the demolition activity or the owner of the building or structure to be demolished shall remove all fluorescent lights and thermostats that contain mercury from
the building or structure to be demolished.

History.
2010-180, s. 14(a).

§§ 130A-310.62 through 130A-310.64.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 8. Risk-Based Environmental Remediation of Sites.

§ 130A-310.65.
Definitions.

As used in this Part:

“Background standard” means the naturally occurring concentration of a substance in the absence of the release of a contaminant.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-122, s. 11(i), effective September 20, 2014.

“Contaminant” means any substance regulated under any program listed in

G.S. 130A-310.67(a)

.

(3a) “Contaminated off-site property” or “off-site property” means property under separate ownership from the contaminated site that is contaminated as a result of a release or migration of contaminants at the contaminated site. This term includes publicly
owned property, including rights-of-way for public streets, roads, or sidewalks.

“Contaminated site,” “source site,” or “site” means any real property that is contaminated, and is the property from which the contamination originated, and may be subject to remediation under any of the programs or requirements set out in

G.S. 130A-310.67(a)

.

“Contamination” means a contaminant released into an environmental medium that has resulted in or has the potential to result in an increase in the concentration of the contaminant in the environmental medium in excess of unrestricted use standards.

“Fund” means the Risk-Based Remediation Fund established pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.76

.

“Institutional controls” means nonengineered measures used to prevent unsafe exposure to contamination, such as land-use restrictions.

“Registered environmental consultant” means an environmental consulting or engineering firm approved to implement and oversee voluntary remedial actions pursuant to Part 3 of Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes and rules adopted to implement
the Part.

“Remedial action plan” means a plan for eliminating or reducing contamination or exposure to contamination.

“Remediation” means all actions that are necessary or appropriate to clean up, mitigate, correct, abate, minimize, eliminate, control, or prevent the spreading, migration, leaking, leaching, volatilization, spilling, transport, or further release of a
contaminant into the environment in order to protect public health, safety, or welfare or the environment.

“Systemic toxicant” means any substance that may enter the body and have a harmful effect other than causing cancer.

“Unrestricted use standards” means contaminant concentrations for each environmental medium that are acceptable for all uses; that are protective of public health, safety, and welfare and the environment; and that comply with generally applicable standards,
guidance, or methods established by statute or adopted, published, or implemented by the Commission or the Department.

History.
2011-186, s. 2; 2014-122, s. 11(i); 2015-286, s. 4.7(a).

§ 130A-310.66.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this Part to authorize the Department to approve the remediation of contaminated sites based on site-specific remediation standards in circumstances where site-specific remediation standards are adequate to protect public health,
safety, and welfare and the environment and are consistent with protection of current and anticipated future use of groundwater and surface water affected or potentially affected by the contamination.

History.
2011-186, s. 2; 2015-286, s. 4.7(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.7(a), effective October 22, 2015, deleted “industrial” following “contaminated” near the beginning.

§ 130A-310.67.
Applicability.

This Part applies to contaminated sites subject to remediation pursuant to any of the following programs or requirements:

The Inactive Hazardous Sites Response Act of 1987 under Part 3 of Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes, including voluntary actions under

G.S. 130A-310.9

of that act, and rules promulgated pursuant to those statutes.

The hazardous waste management program administered by the State pursuant to the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, Public Law 94-580, 90 Stat. 2795, 42 U.S.C. § 6901, et seq., as amended, and Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General
Statutes.

The solid waste management program administered pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

The federal Superfund program administered in part by the State pursuant to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Public Law 96-510, 94 Stat. 2767, 42 U.S.C. § 9601, et seq., as amended, the Superfund Amendments
and Reauthorization Act of 1986, Public Law 99-499, 100 Stat. 1613, as amended, and under Part 4 of Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

The groundwater protection corrective action requirements adopted by the Commission pursuant to Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

Oil Pollution and Hazardous Substances Control Act of 1978, Parts 1 and 2 of Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, except with respect to those sites identified in subdivision (1a) of subsection (b) of this section.

This Part shall not apply to contaminated sites subject to remediation pursuant to any of the following programs or requirements:

The Leaking Petroleum Underground Storage Tank Cleanup program under Part 2A of Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and rules promulgated pursuant to that statute.

(1a)
Leaking petroleum aboveground storage tanks and other sources of petroleum releases governed by Part 7 of Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and rules promulgated pursuant to that Part.

The Dry-Cleaning Solvent Cleanup program under Part 6 of Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and rules promulgated pursuant to that statute.

The pre-1983 landfill assessment and remediation program established under G.S. 130A-310.6(c) through (g).

The Coal Ash Management Act of 2014 under Part 2I of Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes and rules promulgated pursuant to that Part.

Animal waste management systems permitted under Part 1 or Part 1A of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-286 s. 4.7(a), effective October 22, 2015.

History.
2011-186, s. 2; 2015-286, s. 4.7(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.7(a), effective October 22, 2015, deleted “industrial” preceding “sites subject to remediation” two times in the introductory language of subsections (a) and (b); added the exception at the end of subdivision (a)(6); added
subdivisions (b)(1a), (b)(4), and (b)(5); and deleted former subsection (c).

§ 130A-310.68.
Remediation standards.

When conducting remediation activities pursuant to this Part, a person who proposes to or is required to respond to the release of a contaminant at a contaminated industrial site shall comply with one of the following standards:

The unrestricted use standards applicable to each affected medium.

The background standard, if the background standard exceeds the unrestricted use standards.

A site-specific remediation standard developed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section that is approved by the Department.

Any combination of remediation standards described in this subsection that is approved by the Department.

Site-specific remediation standards shall be developed for each medium as provided in this subsection to achieve remediation that eliminates or reduces to protective levels any substantial present or probable future risk to human health, including sensitive
subgroups, and the environment based upon the present or currently planned future use of the property comprising the site. Site-specific remediation standards shall be developed in accordance with all of the following:

Remediation methods and technologies that result in emissions of air pollutants shall comply with applicable air quality standards adopted by the Commission.

The site-specific remediation standard for surface waters shall be the water quality standards adopted by the Commission.

The current and probable future use of groundwater shall be identified and protected. Site-specific sources of contaminants and potential receptors shall be identified. Potential receptors must be protected, controlled, or eliminated whether the receptors
are located on or off the site where the source of contamination is located. Natural environmental conditions affecting the fate and transport of contaminants, such as natural attenuation, shall be determined by appropriate
scientific methods.

Permits for facilities located at sites covered by any of the programs or requirements set out in

G.S. 130A-310.67(a)

shall contain conditions to avoid exceedances of applicable groundwater standards adopted by the Commission pursuant to Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes due to operation of the facility.

Soil shall be remediated to levels that no longer constitute a continuing source of groundwater contamination in excess of the site-specific groundwater remediation standards approved under this Part.

Soil shall be remediated to unrestricted use standards on residential property with the following exceptions:

For mixed-use developments where the ground level uses are nonresidential and where all potential exposure to contaminated soil has been eliminated, the Department may allow soil to remain on the site in excess of unrestricted use standards.

If soil remediation is impracticable because of the presence of preexisting structures or impracticability of removal, all areas of the real property at which a person may come into contact with soil shall be remediated to unrestricted use standards,
and, on all other areas of the real property, engineering and institutional controls that are sufficient to protect public health, safety, and welfare and the environment shall be implemented and maintained.

The potential for human inhalation of contaminants from the outdoor air and other site-specific indoor air exposure pathways shall be considered, if applicable.

The site-specific remediation standard shall protect against human exposure to contamination through the consumption of contaminated fish or wildlife and through the ingestion of contaminants in surface water or groundwater supplies.

For known or suspected carcinogens, site-specific remediation standards shall be established at exposures that represent an excess lifetime cancer risk of one in 1,000,000. The site-specific remediation standard may depart from the one-in-1,000,000 risk
level based on the criteria set out in 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 300.430(e)(9)(July 1, 2003 Edition). The cumulative excess lifetime cancer risk to an exposed individual shall not be greater than one in 10,000 based
on the sum of carcinogenic risk posed by each contaminant present.

For systemic toxicants, site-specific remediation standards shall represent levels to which the human population, including sensitive subgroups, may be exposed without any adverse health effect during a lifetime or part of a lifetime. Site-specific remediation
standards for systemic toxicants shall incorporate an adequate margin of safety and shall take into account cases where two or more systemic toxicants affect the same organ or organ system.

The site-specific remediation standards for each medium shall be adequate to avoid foreseeable adverse effects to other media or the environment that are inconsistent with the risk-based approach under this Part.

History.
2011-186, s. 2.

§ 130A-310.69.
Remedial investigation report; remedial action plans.

A person who proposes to conduct remediation pursuant to this Part shall submit a remedial investigation report to the Department prior to submitting a remedial action plan. The remedial investigation report shall include, but is not limited to, a legal
description of the location of the site; a map showing the location of the site; a description of the contaminants involved and their concentration in the media of the site; a narrative description of the methodology used in the
investigation; a description of all on-site releases of contamination; a site map, drawn to scale, showing benchmarks, directional arrow, location of property boundaries, buildings, structures, all perennial and nonperennial surface
water features, drainage ditches, dense vegetation, contaminant spill or disposal areas, underground utilities, storage vessels, and existing on-site wells; identification of adjacent property owners and adjacent land uses; description
of local geologic and hydrologic conditions; an evaluation of the site and adjacent properties for the existence of environmentally sensitive areas; a description of groundwater monitoring well design and installation procedures;
a map, drawn to scale, that shows all groundwater sample locations; a description of field and laboratory quality control and quality assurance procedures followed during the remedial investigation; a description of methods used
to manage investigation-derived wastes; tabulation of analytical results for all sampling; copies of all laboratory reports; a description of procedures and the results of any special assessments; and any other information required
by the Department or considered relevant by the investigator. The remedial investigation shall assess all contaminated areas of the site, including types and levels of contamination, and the risk that the contamination poses to
public health, safety, and welfare and to the environment.

A person who proposes to conduct remediation pursuant to this Part shall develop and submit a proposed remedial action plan to the Department. A remedial action plan shall provide for the protection of public health, safety, and welfare and the environment.
A remedial action plan shall do all of the following:

Identify actions required to remove, treat, or otherwise appropriately mitigate or isolate the source of contamination to ensure that the source will not cause unrestricted use standards to be exceeded in any medium.

Address contamination that moves from one medium to another in order to prevent a violation of the remediation standards established under

G.S. 130A-310.68

. A more stringent remediation standard may be required for a particular medium to control impact on other media.

Identify the current and anticipated future uses of property comprising the contaminated site and address any concerns raised in public comment on the proposed remedial action plan as to the proposed future uses of the property.

Identify the current and anticipated future uses of groundwater in the contaminated site and address any concerns raised in public comment on the proposed remedial action plan as to the future uses of groundwater.

Determine the appropriate method of remediation to achieve the site-specific remediation standards.

Specify any measures that may be necessary to prevent adverse effects to the environment that may occur at levels of contamination that are lower than the standard necessary to protect human health.

Specify any measures that may be necessary to prevent any discharge into surface waters during implementation of the remedial action plan that violates applicable surface water quality standards adopted by the Commission.

Specify any measures that may be necessary to prevent any air emission during implementation of the remedial action plan that violates applicable air quality standards adopted by the Commission.

Provide for attainment and maintenance of the remediation standards established under

G.S. 130A-310.68

.

Provide for methods and procedures to verify that the quantity, concentration, range, or other measure of each contaminant remaining at the contaminated site at the conclusion of the contaminant-reduction phase of remediation meets the remediation standards
established for the site, that an acceptable level of risk has been achieved, and that no further remediation is required.

Provide for the imposition and recordation of land-use restrictions as provided in

G.S. 143B-279.9

, 143B-279.10, 130A-310.3(f), 130A-310.8, 130A-310.35, 143-215.84(f), and 143-215.85A if the remedial action plan allows contamination in excess of the greater of unrestricted use standards or background
standards to remain on any real property or in groundwater that underlies any real property.

Provide for submission of an annual certification to the Department by the property owner that land use at the site is in compliance with land-use restrictions recorded pursuant to this Part and that the land-use restrictions are still properly recorded
in the chain of title for the property.

Provide a detailed description of the proposed remedial action to be taken; the results of any treatability studies and additional site characterization needed to support the proposed remedial action; plans for postremedial and confirmatory sampling;
a project schedule; a schedule for progress reports to the Department; and any other information required by the Department or considered relevant by the person who submits the proposed remedial action plan.

Provide a description of measures that will be employed to ensure that the safety and health of persons on properties in the vicinity of the site and persons visiting or doing business on the site will not be adversely affected by any remediation activity.

Provide a reasonable estimate of the probable cost of the remedial action sufficient for the Department to determine an acceptable level of financial assurance.

Provide proof of financial assurance as required by

G.S. 130A-310.72

.

A remedial action plan shall also include an analysis of each of the following factors:

Long-term risks and effectiveness of the proposed remediation, including an evaluation of all of the following:

The magnitude of risks remaining after completion of the remediation.

The type, degree, frequency, and duration of any postremediation activity that may be required, including, but not limited to, operation and maintenance, monitoring, inspection, reports, and other activities necessary to protect public health, safety,
and welfare and the environment.

Potential for exposure of human and environmental receptors to contaminants remaining at the site.

Long-term reliability of any engineering and voluntary institutional controls, including repair, maintenance, or replacement of components.

Time required to achieve remediation standards.

Toxicity, mobility, and volume of contaminants, including the amount of contaminants that will be removed, contained, treated, or destroyed; the degree of expected reduction in toxicity, mobility, and volume; and the type, quantity, toxicity, and mobility
of contaminants that will remain after implementation of the remedial action plan.

Short-term risks and effectiveness of the remediation, including the short-term risks that may be posed to the community, workers, or the environment during implementation of the remedial action plan, and the effectiveness and reliability of protective
measures to address short-term risks.

The ease or difficulty of implementing the remedial action plan, including commercially available remedial measures; expected operational reliability; available capacity and location of needed treatment, storage, and disposal services for wastes; time
to initiate remediation; and approvals necessary to implement the remediation.

The development of a remedial action plan may require supplemental submissions and revisions based on Department review, remedial action pilot studies, and public comment from local government and citizens.

History.
2011-186, s. 2.

§ 130A-310.70.
Notice of intent to remediate.

In addition to the public participation requirements of the individual programs listed in

G.S. 130A-310.67(a)

, the person who proposes to remediate a site under this Part shall send a notice of intent to remediate to all local governments having taxing or land-use jurisdiction over the site, and to all adjoining landowners.
The notice shall include all of the information required in G.S. 130A-310.69(a) and include a statement of intent to clean up the site to site-specific remediation standards. The person shall submit to the Department a copy of the
notice of intent provided to local governments and adjoining landowners, a certification that the notice of intent to remediate was so provided to those parties, and all information and comments that the person received in response
to the notice. In addition, the person shall, when appropriate, describe how the remedial action plan was modified to address comments received in response to the notice.

History.
2011-186, s. 2.

§ 130A-310.71.
Review and approval of proposed remedial action plans.

The Department shall review and approve a proposed remedial action plan consistent with the remediation standards set out in

G.S. 130A-310.68

and the procedures set out in this section. In its review of a proposed remedial action plan, the Department shall do all of the following:

Determine whether site-specific remediation standards are appropriate for a particular contaminated site. In making this determination, the Department shall consider proximity of the contamination to water supply wells or other receptors; current and
probable future reliance on the groundwater as a water supply; current and anticipated future land use; environmental impacts; and the feasibility of remediation to unrestricted use standards.

Determine whether the party conducting the remediation has adequately demonstrated through modeling or other scientific means acceptable to the Department that no contamination will migrate to off-site property at levels above unrestricted use standards,
except as may remain pursuant to a cleanup conducted pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.73

A(a)(2).

Determine whether the proposed remedial action plan meets the requirements of

G.S. 130A-310.69

.

Determine whether the proposed remedial action plan meets the requirements of any other applicable remediation program except those pertaining to remediation standards.

Establish the acceptable level or range of levels of risk to public health, safety, and welfare and to the environment.

Establish, for each contaminant, the maximum allowable quantity, concentration, range, or other measures of contamination that will remain at the contaminated site at the conclusion of the contaminant-reduction phase of the remediation.

Consider the technical performance, effectiveness, and reliability of the proposed remedial action plan in attaining and maintaining compliance with applicable remediation standards.

Consider the ability of the person who proposes to remediate the site to implement the proposed remedial action plan within a reasonable time and without jeopardizing public health, safety, or welfare or the environment.

Determine whether the proposed remedial action plan adequately provides for the imposition and maintenance of engineering and institutional controls and for sampling, monitoring, and reporting requirements necessary to protect public health, safety, and
welfare and the environment. In making this determination, the Department may consider, in lieu of land-use restrictions authorized under

G.S. 130A-310.69

, reliance on other State or local land-use controls. Any land-use controls implemented shall adequately protect public health, safety, and welfare and the environment and provide adequate notice to current
and future property owners of any residual contamination and the land-use controls in place.

Approve the circumstances under which no further remediation is required.

The person who proposes a remedial action plan has the burden of demonstrating with reasonable assurance that contamination from the site will not migrate to off-site property above unrestricted use levels, except as may remain pursuant to a cleanup conducted
pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.73

A(a)(2), and that the remedial action plan is protective of public health, safety, and welfare and the environment by virtue of its compliance with this Part. The demonstration shall (i) take into account actions
proposed in the remedial action plan that will prevent contamination from migrating off the site; and (ii) use scientifically valid site-specific data.

The Department may require a person who proposes a remedial action plan to supply any additional information necessary for the Department to approve or disapprove the plan.

In making a determination on a proposed remedial action plan, the Department shall consider the information provided by the person who proposes the remedial action plan as well as information provided by local governments and adjoining landowners pursuant
to

G.S. 130A-310.70

. The Department shall disapprove a proposed remedial action plan unless the Department finds that the plan is protective of public health, safety, and welfare and the environment and complies with the requirements
of this Part. If the Department disapproves a proposed remedial action plan, the person who submitted the plan may seek review as provided in Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If the Department fails to approve
or disapprove a proposed remedial action plan within 120 days after a complete plan has been submitted, the person who submitted the plan may treat the plan as having been disapproved at the end of that time period.

If, pursuant to subdivision (9) of subsection (a) of this section, reliance on other State or local land-use controls is approved by the Department in lieu of land-use restrictions, a “Notice of Residual Contamination” shall be prepared and filed in the
chain of title of each contaminated site or contaminated off-site property where any contamination has or will in the future exceed unrestricted use standards. The Notice shall identify the type of contamination on the site or
property and the land-use controls that address the contamination and may be filed by the person who proposes to remediate the site. Provided, however, the Department may only approve imposition of land-use controls on contaminated
off-site property with the written consent of the owner of the property in conformance with

G.S. 130A-310.73

A(a)(2).

History.
2011-186, s. 2; 2015-286, s. 4.7(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.7(a), effective October 22, 2015, substituted “off-site property” for “adjacent property” and inserted “except as may remain pursuant to a cleanup conducted pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.73

A(a)(2)” in subdivision (a)(2) and the first sentence of subsection (b); added the last two sentences of subdivision (a)(9); and added subsection (e).

§ 130A-310.72.
Financial assurance requirement.

The person conducting remediation of a contaminated site pursuant to the provisions of this Part shall establish financial assurance that will ensure that sufficient funds are available to implement and maintain the actions or controls specified in the
remedial action plan for the site. The person conducting remediation of a site may establish financial assurance through one of the following mechanisms, or any combination of the following mechanisms, in a form specified or approved
by the Department: insurance products issued from entities having no corporate or ownership association with the person conducting the remediation; funded trusts; surety bonds; certificates of deposit; letters of credit; corporate
financial tests; local government financial tests; corporate guarantees; local government guarantees; capital reserve funds; or any other financial mechanism authorized for the demonstration of financial assurance under (i) 40 Code
of Federal Regulations Part 264, Subpart H (July 1, 2010 Edition) and (ii) Section.1600 of Subchapter B of Chapter 13 of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code. Proof of financial assurance shall be provided in the remedial
action plan and annually thereafter on the anniversary date of the approval of the plan. The Department may waive the requirement for a person conducting remediation of a contaminated site pursuant to the provisions of this Part to
establish or maintain financial assurance if the Department finds that the only actions or controls to be implemented or maintained as part of the remedial action plan for the site include either or both of the following:

Annual reporting of land-use controls.

The maintenance of durable or low-maintenance covers for contaminated soil.

History.
2011-186, s. 2; 2017-209, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-209, s. 1, effective October 4, 2017, in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph, deleted “industrial” preceding “site pursuant to”; added the fourth sentence of the introductory paragraph; and added subdivisions (1) and (2).